Utah statutes.
72-7-105.   Obstructing traffic on sidewalks or highways prohibited.

(1) A person may not:

(a)  drive or place any vehicle, animal, or other thing upon or along any sidewalk except in crossing the sidewalk to or from abutting property; or

(b)  permit the vehicle, animal, or other thing to remain on or across any sidewalk in a way that impedes or obstructs the ordinary use of the sidewalk.

(2) (a)  Except under Subsection (2)(b), vehicles, building material, or other similar things may be placed temporarily on highways in a manner that will not  impede, endanger, or obstruct ordinary traffic.

(b)  A highway authority may prohibit or may require the removal of  vehicles, building material, or other obstructions on any highway under their jurisdiction.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 270, 1998 General Session

